vec_IT/vec_IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/e0e1e2P0P1P2I0
SFX e0 Y 229
SFX e0 io i/P0P3I2 io
SFX e0 ir arane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir aratu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir arave/P3 ir	ts:conditional_present
SFX e0 ir aremo/P0I0 ir
SFX e0 ir aren/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir arense ir
SFX e0 ir arensi ir
SFX e0 ir aresi/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir aresiu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir arion/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arione/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir arionse ir
SFX e0 ir arisen/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir arisense ir
SFX e0 ir arisensi ir
SFX e0 ir arisi/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir arision/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisione/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir arisionse ir
SFX e0 ir arisiu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir arisié/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir arisiéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir arison/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir arisonse ir
SFX e0 ir arié/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir ariéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir aron/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir aronse ir
SFX e0 ir arà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir aràe/P3 ir	ts:conditional_present
SFX e0 ir aràvene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir arè/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arène/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir aré/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir arémoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir arémome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir arémomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir arésimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arésimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir arésitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir aréu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir aría/I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir arèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir aríane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir aríatu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir aríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir aríene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir arísitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir arò/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir aròe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir ede/I4 ir	ts:subjunctive_present
SFX e0 ir ege/I4 ir	ts:subjunctive_present
SFX e0 ir en/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir endo/P0 ir	ts:gerund_simple
SFX e0 ir ene/I1 ir	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir ense ir	ts:indicative_imperfect ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX e0 ir ente/M0Ᵽd ir	ts:participle_active
SFX e0 ir ènte/M0 ir	ts:participle_active
SFX e0 ir erane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir eratu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir erave/P3 ir	ts:conditional_present
SFX e0 ir eremo/P0I0 ir
SFX e0 ir eren/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir erense ir
SFX e0 ir erensi ir
SFX e0 ir eresi/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir eresiu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir erion/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erione/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir erionse ir
SFX e0 ir erisen/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir erisense ir
SFX e0 ir erisensi ir
SFX e0 ir erisi/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir erision/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisione/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir erisionse ir
SFX e0 ir erisiu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir erisié/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir erisiéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir erison/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir erisonse ir
SFX e0 ir erié/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir eriéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir eron/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir eronse ir
SFX e0 ir erà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir eràe/P3 ir	ts:conditional_present
SFX e0 ir eràvene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir erè/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erène/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir eré/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir erémoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir erémome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir erémomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir erésimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erésimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir erésitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir eréu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir ería/I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir erèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir eríane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir eríatu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir eríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir eríene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir erísitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir erò/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir eròe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir ese/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir esto/A1 ir
SFX e0 ir eva/P3I0I4 ir
SFX e0 ir eve/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir evi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir evo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir èva/P3I0I4 ir
SFX e0 ir ève/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir èvi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir èvo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir on/P0I0 ir
SFX e0 ir one/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir onme/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir é/P3I4 ir
SFX e0 ir éa/P3I0I4 ir
SFX e0 ir éane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir éau/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir ée/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir éene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir éi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir éimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir éimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir éitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir éndome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir éndomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir éntome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir éntomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir éo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir éone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir ésimo ir
SFX e0 ir éu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir évane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir évau/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir évene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir évimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir évimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir évitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir évone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir í/P3I4 ir
SFX e0 ir ía/P3I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir èe/P3I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir íane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir íau/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir íe/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir íene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir íi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir íimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir íimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir íitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir ímoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir índome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir índomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir íntome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir íntomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir ío/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir íone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir ísimo ir
SFX e0 ir ísitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir íu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir ívane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir ívau/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir ívene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir ívimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir ívimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir ívitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir ívone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 ir ónmene/P6 ir
SFX e0 o a/P0 o
SFX e0 o e/P0P3I0 [^lr]o
SFX e0 o e/P0P3I0 [aeiouàèéíòóú][lr]o
SFX e0 o e/P0P3I0 [^aeiouàèéíòóú][lr]o
SFX e0 o i/P0P3I2 [^i]o
SFX e0 r do/A1 ir
SFX e0 r ede/I4 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r ege/I4 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r ge ir
SFX e0 r me/P6 ir
SFX e0 r mo/P0I0 ir
SFX e0 r n/I0 ir
SFX e0 r nsi ir	ts:indicative_imperfect ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX e0 r on/P0I0 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r one/I1 [^cijɉñ]ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 r onme/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r se/M0 ir
SFX e0 r sen/I0 ir
SFX e0 r sene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 r sense ir
SFX e0 r sensi ir
SFX e0 r siede/I4 ir
SFX e0 r siege/I4 ir
SFX e0 r sion/I0 ir
SFX e0 r sione/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 r sionse ir
SFX e0 r sié/I4 ir
SFX e0 r son/I0 ir
SFX e0 r sone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 r sonse ir
SFX e0 r ven/I0 ir
SFX e0 r vene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 r vense ir
SFX e0 r vensi ir
SFX e0 r vion/I0 ir
SFX e0 r vione/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 r vionse ir
SFX e0 r vié/I4 ir
SFX e0 r viéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 r von/I0 ir
SFX e0 r vone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX e0 r vonse ir
SFX e0 r é/I4 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r éu/I5 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r ónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir
