vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
avro/e0e1e2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:avrir
dormir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
dòrmo/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:dormir
dromir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
dròmo/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:dromir
ensir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
enso/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ensir
esir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
eso/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:esir
riesir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
rieso/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:riéser st:riesir
xeguir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
exeguir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
exèguo/e0e1e2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:exeguir
languir/a0a1e0e1P0P1*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
languo/e0e1P0P1I0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:languir
ƚanguir/a0a2e0e2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ƚanguo/e0e2P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ƚanguir
inmalmorir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inmalmòro/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:inmalmorir
xmalmorir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xmalmòro/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:xmalmorir
mentir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2-0V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
mento/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0-0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:mentir
mènto/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0-0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:mentir
morir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2*0^2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
mòro/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0*0^2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:morir
moro/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0*0^2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:morir
ofrir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
òfro/e0e1e2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ofrir
pènto/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:pentir
arpento/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:arpentir
salo/a0e0e1P0P1FSI0+0.0-0^6	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:salar st:salir
salir/a0a1e0e1P0P1.0-0^6	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sekuir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
seguir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2+0:0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
proseguir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
subseguir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sèguo/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2I0+0:0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:sèguer st:seguir
prosèguo/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:prosèguer st:proseguir
sentir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2.0:0^6^7r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
akonsento/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:akonsentir
disentir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
disènto/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:disentir
sèrvo/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0@0-0.0:0^8	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:servar st:servir st:sèrver
sòfro/e0e1e2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:sofrir
spesir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
teñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2.0-0@0:0^1r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
asteñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
intrateñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
oteñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sosteñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
susteñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
aparteño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:apartéñer st:aparteñir
inkonteño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:inkontéñer st:inkonteñir
manteño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:mantéñer st:manteñir
perteño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0Ṿŧ	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:pertéñer st:perteñir
substeño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:substéñer st:substeñir
usir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
riusir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
varentir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
interveñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
intreveñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
konveñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2-1*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
rinveñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
soveñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
subveño/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:subveñir
veño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0-0-1.0@0^4	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:véñer st:veñir
intarveño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:intarvéñer st:intarveñir
intraveño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:intravéñer st:intraveñir
perveño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0Ṿŧ	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:pervéñer st:perveñir
soveño/a0e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:sovéñer st:soveñir
vestir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2+0-1.0^1^6^7r0r2r3r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
envestir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
reinvestir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xvestir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2^6	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vistir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2+0-1.0^1^6^7r0r2r3r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
envistir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
reinvistir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xvistir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2^6	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
viñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2-0-1.0@0^2^4	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
intarviñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
intraviñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
perviñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2Ṿŧ	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
skoviñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2-0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
subviñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
soraviñir/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
invisto/e0e1e2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:invistir
